Hawaii statutes.
§431K-4 Compulsory associations. (a)
No risk retention group shall be permitted to join or contribute financially to
any insurance insolvency guaranty fund, or similar mechanism, in this State,
nor shall any risk retention group or its insureds receive any benefit from any
such fund for claims arising out of the operations of such risk retention
group.

(b) When a purchasing group obtains insurance
covering its members' risks from an insurer not authorized in this State or a
risk retention group, no such risks wherever resident or located shall be
covered by any insurance insolvency guaranty fund or similar mechanism in this
State.

(c) When a purchasing group obtains insurance
covering its members' risks from an insurer authorized in Hawaii, claims shall
be covered by the property and liability insurance guaranty association,
subject to the provisions of chapter 431, article 16.

(d) A risk retention group shall participate
in this State's joint underwriting associations and mandatory liability pools as
provided by any law of this State. [L 1987, c 180, pt of §1; am L 1989, c 272,
§5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next